test/src/gt-norm-yamls/P-complex_kene_gt-norm.yaml
     #
     niisugune+Pron+Sg+Nom: niisugune
     niisugune+Pron+Sg+Gen: niisuguse
     niisugune+Pron+Sg+Par: niisugust
     niisugune+Pron+Sg+Ill: niisugusesse
     niisugune+Pron+Sg+Ine: niisuguses
     niisugune+Pron+Sg+Ela: niisugusest
     niisugune+Pron+Sg+All: niisugusele
     niisugune+Pron+Sg+Ade: niisugusel
     niisugune+Pron+Sg+Abl: niisuguselt
     niisugune+Pron+Sg+Tra: niisuguseks
     niisugune+Pron+Sg+Trm: niisuguseni
     niisugune+Pron+Sg+Ess: niisugusena
     niisugune+Pron+Sg+Abe: niisuguseta
     niisugune+Pron+Sg+Com: niisugusega
     niisugune+Pron+Pl+Nom: niisugused
     niisugune+Pron+Pl+Gen: niisuguste
     niisugune+Pron+Pl+Par: niisuguseid
     niisugune+Pron+Pl+Ill: [niisugustesse, niisuguseisse]
     niisugune+Pron+Pl+Ine: [niisugustes, niisuguseis]
     niisugune+Pron+Pl+Ela: [niisugustest, niisuguseist]
     niisugune+Pron+Pl+All: [niisugustele, niisuguseile]
     niisugune+Pron+Pl+Ade: [niisugustel, niisuguseil]
     niisugune+Pron+Pl+Abl: [niisugustelt, niisuguseilt]
     niisugune+Pron+Pl+Tra: [niisugusteks, niisuguseiks]
     niisugune+Pron+Pl+Trm: niisugusteni
     niisugune+Pron+Pl+Ess: niisugustena
     niisugune+Pron+Pl+Abe: niisugusteta
     niisugune+Pron+Pl+Com: niisugustega
     #
     teistsugune+Pron+Sg+Nom: teistsugune
     teistsugune+Pron+Sg+Gen: teistsuguse
     teistsugune+Pron+Sg+Par: teistsugust
     teistsugune+Pron+Sg+Ill: teistsugusesse
     teistsugune+Pron+Sg+Ine: teistsuguses
     teistsugune+Pron+Sg+Ela: teistsugusest
     teistsugune+Pron+Sg+All: teistsugusele
     teistsugune+Pron+Sg+Ade: teistsugusel
     teistsugune+Pron+Sg+Abl: teistsuguselt
     teistsugune+Pron+Sg+Tra: teistsuguseks
     teistsugune+Pron+Sg+Trm: teistsuguseni
     teistsugune+Pron+Sg+Ess: teistsugusena
     teistsugune+Pron+Sg+Abe: teistsuguseta
     teistsugune+Pron+Sg+Com: teistsugusega
     teistsugune+Pron+Pl+Nom: teistsugused
     teistsugune+Pron+Pl+Gen: teistsuguste
     teistsugune+Pron+Pl+Par: teistsuguseid
     teistsugune+Pron+Pl+Ill: [teistsugustesse, teistsuguseisse]
     teistsugune+Pron+Pl+Ine: [teistsugustes, teistsuguseis]
     teistsugune+Pron+Pl+Ela: [teistsugustest, teistsuguseist]
     teistsugune+Pron+Pl+All: [teistsugustele, teistsuguseile]
     teistsugune+Pron+Pl+Ade: [teistsugustel, teistsuguseil]
     teistsugune+Pron+Pl+Abl: [teistsugustelt, teistsuguseilt]
     teistsugune+Pron+Pl+Tra: [teistsugusteks, teistsuguseiks]
     teistsugune+Pron+Pl+Trm: teistsugusteni
     teistsugune+Pron+Pl+Ess: teistsugustena
     teistsugune+Pron+Pl+Abe: teistsugusteta
     teistsugune+Pron+Pl+Com: teistsugustega
     #
     mingisugune+Pron+Sg+Nom: mingisugune
     mingisugune+Pron+Sg+Gen: mingisuguse
     mingisugune+Pron+Sg+Par: mingisugust
     mingisugune+Pron+Sg+Ill: mingisugusesse
     mingisugune+Pron+Sg+Ine: mingisuguses
     mingisugune+Pron+Sg+Ela: mingisugusest
     mingisugune+Pron+Sg+All: mingisugusele
     mingisugune+Pron+Sg+Ade: mingisugusel
     mingisugune+Pron+Sg+Abl: mingisuguselt
     mingisugune+Pron+Sg+Tra: mingisuguseks
     mingisugune+Pron+Sg+Trm: mingisuguseni
     mingisugune+Pron+Sg+Ess: mingisugusena
     mingisugune+Pron+Sg+Abe: mingisuguseta
     mingisugune+Pron+Sg+Com: mingisugusega
     mingisugune+Pron+Pl+Nom: mingisugused
     mingisugune+Pron+Pl+Gen: mingisuguste
     mingisugune+Pron+Pl+Par: mingisuguseid
     mingisugune+Pron+Pl+Ill: [mingisugustesse, mingisuguseisse]
     mingisugune+Pron+Pl+Ine: [mingisugustes, mingisuguseis]
     mingisugune+Pron+Pl+Ela: [mingisugustest, mingisuguseist]
     mingisugune+Pron+Pl+All: [mingisugustele, mingisuguseile]
     mingisugune+Pron+Pl+Ade: [mingisugustel, mingisuguseil]
     mingisugune+Pron+Pl+Abl: [mingisugustelt, mingisuguseilt]
     mingisugune+Pron+Pl+Tra: [mingisugusteks, mingisuguseiks]
     mingisugune+Pron+Pl+Trm: mingisugusteni
     mingisugune+Pron+Pl+Ess: mingisugustena
     mingisugune+Pron+Pl+Abe: mingisugusteta
     mingisugune+Pron+Pl+Com: mingisugustega
     #
     seesamune+Pron+Sg+Nom: seesamune
     seesamune+Pron+Sg+Gen: sellesamuse
     seesamune+Pron+Sg+Par: sedasamust
     seesamune+Pron+Sg+Ill: [sellessesamusesse, sessesamusesse]
     seesamune+Pron+Sg+Ine: [sellessamuses, sessamuses]
     seesamune+Pron+Sg+Ela: [sellestsamusest, sestsamusest]
     seesamune+Pron+Sg+All: sellelesamusele
     seesamune+Pron+Sg+Ade: [sellelsamusel, selsamusel]
     seesamune+Pron+Sg+Abl: [selleltsamuselt, seltsamuselt]
     seesamune+Pron+Sg+Tra: [sekssamuseks, sellekssamuseks]
     seesamune+Pron+Sg+Trm: sellesamuseni
     seesamune+Pron+Sg+Ess: sellesamusena
     seesamune+Pron+Sg+Abe: sellesamuseta
     seesamune+Pron+Sg+Com: sellesamusega
     seesamune+Pron+Pl+Nom: needsamused
     seesamune+Pron+Pl+Gen: nendesamuste
     seesamune+Pron+Pl+Par: neidsamuseid
     seesamune+Pron+Pl+Ill: [nendessesamustesse, neissesamuseisse]
     seesamune+Pron+Pl+Ine: [nendessamustes, neissamuseis]
     seesamune+Pron+Pl+Ela: [nendestsamustest, neistsamuseist]
     seesamune+Pron+Pl+All: nendelesamustele
     seesamune+Pron+Pl+Ade: [nendelsamustel, neilsamuseil]
     seesamune+Pron+Pl+Abl: [nendeltsamustelt, neiltsamuseilt]
     seesamune+Pron+Pl+Tra: [nendekssamusteks, neikssamuseiks]
     seesamune+Pron+Pl+Trm: nendesamusteni
     seesamune+Pron+Pl+Ess: nendesamustena
     seesamune+Pron+Pl+Abe: nendesamusteta
     seesamune+Pron+Pl+Com: nendesamustega
     #
     seesamane+Pron+Sg+Nom: seesamane
     seesamane+Pron+Sg+Gen: sellesamase
     seesamane+Pron+Sg+Par: sedasamast
     seesamane+Pron+Sg+Ill: [sellessesamasesse, sessesamasesse]
     seesamane+Pron+Sg+Ine: [sellessamases, sessamases]
     seesamane+Pron+Sg+Ela: [sellestsamasest, sestsamasest]
     seesamane+Pron+Sg+All: sellelesamasele
     seesamane+Pron+Sg+Ade: [sellelsamasel, selsamasel]
     seesamane+Pron+Sg+Abl: [selleltsamaselt, seltsamaselt]
     seesamane+Pron+Sg+Tra: [sekssamaseks, sellekssamaseks]
     seesamane+Pron+Sg+Trm: sellesamaseni
     seesamane+Pron+Sg+Ess: sellesamasena
     seesamane+Pron+Sg+Abe: sellesamaseta
     seesamane+Pron+Sg+Com: sellesamasega
     seesamane+Pron+Pl+Nom: needsamased
     seesamane+Pron+Pl+Gen: nendesamaste
     seesamane+Pron+Pl+Par: neidsamaseid
     seesamane+Pron+Pl+Ill: [nendessesamastesse, neissesamaseisse]
     seesamane+Pron+Pl+Ine: [nendessamastes, neissamaseis]
     seesamane+Pron+Pl+Ela: [nendestsamastest, neistsamaseist]
     seesamane+Pron+Pl+All: nendelesamastele
     seesamane+Pron+Pl+Ade: [nendelsamastel, neilsamaseil]
     seesamane+Pron+Pl+Abl: [nendeltsamastelt, neiltsamaseilt]
     seesamane+Pron+Pl+Tra: [nendekssamasteks, neikssamaseiks]
     seesamane+Pron+Pl+Trm: nendesamasteni
     seesamane+Pron+Pl+Ess: nendesamastena
     seesamane+Pron+Pl+Abe: nendesamasteta
     seesamane+Pron+Pl+Com: nendesamastega
     #
     seesinane+Pron+Sg+Nom: seesinane
     seesinane+Pron+Sg+Gen: [sellesinase, sellesinatse]
     seesinane+Pron+Sg+Par: sedasinast
     seesinane+Pron+Sg+Ill: [sellessesinasesse, sellessesinatsesse, sessesinasesse, sessesinatsesse]
     seesinane+Pron+Sg+Ine: [sellessinases, sellessinatses, sessinases, sessinatses]
     seesinane+Pron+Sg+Ela: [sellestsinasest, sellestsinatsest, sestsinasest, sestsinatsest]
     seesinane+Pron+Sg+All: [sellelesinasele, sellelesinatsele]
     seesinane+Pron+Sg+Ade: [sellelsinasel, sellelsinatsel, selsinasel, selsinatsel]
     seesinane+Pron+Sg+Abl: [selleltsinaselt, selleltsinatselt, seltsinaselt, seltsinatselt]
     seesinane+Pron+Sg+Tra: [sekssinaseks, sekssinatseks, sellekssinaseks, sellekssinatseks]
     seesinane+Pron+Sg+Trm: [sellesinaseni, sellesinatseni]
     seesinane+Pron+Sg+Ess: [sellesinasena, sellesinatsena]
     seesinane+Pron+Sg+Abe: [sellesinaseta, sellesinatseta]
     seesinane+Pron+Sg+Com: [sellesinasega, sellesinatsega]
     seesinane+Pron+Pl+Nom: [needsinased, needsinatsed]
     seesinane+Pron+Pl+Gen: nendesinaste
     seesinane+Pron+Pl+Par: [neidsinaseid, neidsinatseid]
     seesinane+Pron+Pl+Ill: [nendessesinastesse, neissesinaseisse]
     seesinane+Pron+Pl+Ine: [nendessinastes, neissinaseis]
     seesinane+Pron+Pl+Ela: [nendestsinastest, neistsinaseist]
     seesinane+Pron+Pl+All: nendelesinastele
     seesinane+Pron+Pl+Ade: [nendelsinastel, neilsinaseil]
     seesinane+Pron+Pl+Abl: [nendeltsinastelt, neiltsinaseilt]
     seesinane+Pron+Pl+Tra: [nendekssinasteks, neikssinaseiks]
     seesinane+Pron+Pl+Trm: nendesinasteni
     seesinane+Pron+Pl+Ess: nendesinastena
     seesinane+Pron+Pl+Abe: nendesinasteta
     seesinane+Pron+Pl+Com: nendesinastega
     #
     sinusugune+Pron+Sg+Nom: sinusugune
     sinusugune+Pron+Sg+Gen: sinusuguse
     sinusugune+Pron+Sg+Par: sinusugust
     sinusugune+Pron+Sg+Ill: sinusugusesse
     sinusugune+Pron+Sg+Ine: sinusuguses
     sinusugune+Pron+Sg+Ela: sinusugusest
     sinusugune+Pron+Sg+All: sinusugusele
     sinusugune+Pron+Sg+Ade: sinusugusel
     sinusugune+Pron+Sg+Abl: sinusuguselt
     sinusugune+Pron+Sg+Tra: sinusuguseks
     sinusugune+Pron+Sg+Trm: sinusuguseni
     sinusugune+Pron+Sg+Ess: sinusugusena
     sinusugune+Pron+Sg+Abe: sinusuguseta
     sinusugune+Pron+Sg+Com: sinusugusega
     sinusugune+Pron+Pl+Nom: sinusugused
     sinusugune+Pron+Pl+Gen: sinusuguste
     sinusugune+Pron+Pl+Par: sinusuguseid
     sinusugune+Pron+Pl+Ill: [sinusugustesse, sinusuguseisse]
     sinusugune+Pron+Pl+Ine: [sinusugustes, sinusuguseis]
     sinusugune+Pron+Pl+Ela: [sinusugustest, sinusuguseist]
     sinusugune+Pron+Pl+All: [sinusugustele, sinusuguseile]
     sinusugune+Pron+Pl+Ade: [sinusugustel, sinusuguseil]
     sinusugune+Pron+Pl+Abl: [sinusugustelt, sinusuguseilt]
     sinusugune+Pron+Pl+Tra: [sinusugusteks, sinusuguseiks]
     sinusugune+Pron+Pl+Trm: sinusugusteni
     sinusugune+Pron+Pl+Ess: sinusugustena
     sinusugune+Pron+Pl+Abe: sinusugusteta
     sinusugune+Pron+Pl+Com: sinusugustega
     #
     sinutaoline+Pron+Sg+Nom: sinutaoline
     sinutaoline+Pron+Sg+Gen: sinutaolise
     sinutaoline+Pron+Sg+Par: sinutaolist
     sinutaoline+Pron+Sg+Ill: [sinutaolisesse, sinutaolisse]
     sinutaoline+Pron+Sg+Ine: sinutaolises
     sinutaoline+Pron+Sg+Ela: sinutaolisest
     sinutaoline+Pron+Sg+All: sinutaolisele
     sinutaoline+Pron+Sg+Ade: sinutaolisel
     sinutaoline+Pron+Sg+Abl: sinutaoliselt
     sinutaoline+Pron+Sg+Tra: sinutaoliseks
     sinutaoline+Pron+Sg+Trm: sinutaoliseni
     sinutaoline+Pron+Sg+Ess: sinutaolisena
     sinutaoline+Pron+Sg+Abe: sinutaoliseta
     sinutaoline+Pron+Sg+Com: sinutaolisega
     sinutaoline+Pron+Pl+Nom: sinutaolised
     sinutaoline+Pron+Pl+Gen: sinutaoliste
     sinutaoline+Pron+Pl+Par: [sinutaoliseid, sinutaolisi]
     sinutaoline+Pron+Pl+Ill: [sinutaolistesse, sinutaolisisse]
     sinutaoline+Pron+Pl+Ine: [sinutaolistes, sinutaolisis]
     sinutaoline+Pron+Pl+Ela: [sinutaolistest, sinutaolisist]
     sinutaoline+Pron+Pl+All: [sinutaolistele, sinutaolisile]
     sinutaoline+Pron+Pl+Ade: [sinutaolistel, sinutaolisil]
     sinutaoline+Pron+Pl+Abl: [sinutaolistelt, sinutaolisilt]
     sinutaoline+Pron+Pl+Tra: [sinutaolisteks, sinutaolisiks]
     sinutaoline+Pron+Pl+Trm: sinutaolisteni
     sinutaoline+Pron+Pl+Ess: sinutaolistena
     sinutaoline+Pron+Pl+Abe: sinutaolisteta
     sinutaoline+Pron+Pl+Com: sinutaolistega
     #
     temasugune+Pron+Sg+Nom: temasugune
     temasugune+Pron+Sg+Gen: temasuguse
     temasugune+Pron+Sg+Par: temasugust
     temasugune+Pron+Sg+Ill: temasugusesse
     temasugune+Pron+Sg+Ine: temasuguses
     temasugune+Pron+Sg+Ela: temasugusest
     temasugune+Pron+Sg+All: temasugusele
     temasugune+Pron+Sg+Ade: temasugusel
     temasugune+Pron+Sg+Abl: temasuguselt
     temasugune+Pron+Sg+Tra: temasuguseks
     temasugune+Pron+Sg+Trm: temasuguseni
     temasugune+Pron+Sg+Ess: temasugusena
     temasugune+Pron+Sg+Abe: temasuguseta
     temasugune+Pron+Sg+Com: temasugusega
     temasugune+Pron+Pl+Nom: temasugused
     temasugune+Pron+Pl+Gen: temasuguste
     temasugune+Pron+Pl+Par: temasuguseid
     temasugune+Pron+Pl+Ill: [temasugustesse, temasuguseisse]
